Utah statutes.
3-1-12.   Meetings.
Within 90 days after the incorporation of an association the members thereof
shall hold an organization meeting at a time and place fixed by the temporary
board of directors. Not less than 10 days' written notice thereof shall be
given to each member. An association may provide in its bylaws for one or more
regular meetings each year, which may be held within or without the state at
the time and place designated in the bylaws. Special meetings of the members
may be called by the board of directors, and it shall be their duty to call
such meetings when 10 per centum of the members file with the secretary a
petition demanding a special meeting and specifying the business to be
considered at such meeting. Notice of all meetings, except as otherwise
provided by law or the articles or bylaws, shall be mailed to each member at
least 10 days prior to the meeting, and in case of special meetings the notice
shall state the purposes for which it is called, but the bylaws may require
that all notices shall be given by publication in a periodical published by or
for the association, to which substantially all its members are subscribers,
or in a newspaper or newspapers whose combined circulation is general in the
territory in which the association operates.
